Tennessee, session 114, SB2568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-205(c), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(10) Advertising services purchased by or on behalf of a business entity that
generates annual revenue in an amount equal to or greater than one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000). For purposes of this subdivision (c)(10), "advertising" means
any written, electronic, or printed communication for the purpose of promoting a brand,
product, or service to the public in order to create an interest in the brand, product, or
service, or induce a person to purchase or use a product or service and includes
sponsorships and television, digital, radio, billboard, and print advertising.
SECTION 2. The Department of Revenue is authorized to promulgate rules to
effectuate this act. The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform
Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 5.
SECTION 3. For purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming a
law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect January 1, 2027,
the public welfare requiring it.
SB2568
009485
- 1 -